Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 10. State Budget Department
§ 9-2-1019.
Personnel hearings; state employee compensation commission created; duties. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:71; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2023; Laws 1979, ch. 138, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 15, § 321(o); 1997, ch. 88, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2000, ch. 39, § 1; 2007, ch. 37, § 1; 2012, ch. 96, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3206

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§§ 9-2-1020 and 9-2-1021.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 197, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 203, §§ 25 and 26, related to the career service council.

§ 9-2-1022.
Duties of department performed through human resources division. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:74; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2026; Laws 1979, ch. 10, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 113, § 1; 1986, ch. 28, § 1; 1987, ch. 95, § 1; ch. 171, § 1; 1988, ch. 54, § 1; 1989, ch. 52, §§ 1, 2; ch. 223, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1992, ch. 71, § 1; 1993, ch. 80, § 1; ch. 183, § 1; 1994, ch. 15, §§ 321(o), 327; 1996, ch. 1, § 337; 1996, ch. 110, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 1998, ch. 24, § 1; ch. 30, § 303; ch. 32, § 1; ch. 98, § 1; 1999, ch. 33, § 1; 2000, ch. 29, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 3; 2007, ch. 152, § 1, ch. 205, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2009, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 85, § 1; 2014 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 57, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; 2020 ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3207

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1023.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 28, related to the duties of the department being performed through the facilities management division.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective March 13, 2008.

§ 9-2-1024.
Duties performed through division of economic analysis. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:76; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2028; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 2011, ch. 154, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3208

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1025.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 178, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 107, § 1, related to the powers, duties and functions of the motor vehicle management services division.

§ 9-2-1026.
Purchasing for legislature and judiciary; approval; requirements. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 10, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2032; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1994, ch. 57, § 1; 2005, ch. 181, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3209

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.1.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 178, § 1, related to duties performed through information technology division.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 9-2-1026.2.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 178, § 1, related to state telecommunications council, membership, vacancies, chairman, expenses, duties, state chief information officer to assist, cooperation with other entities, annual report.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 9-2-1026.3.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 142, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 2, pertained to the creation, membership, powers and duties of the state library board.

Laws 2005, ch. 142, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 9-2-1026.4.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 142, § 2.

§ 9-2-1026.5.
Federal library funds. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 2; 2005, ch. 142, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3210

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.6.
State librarian; appointment; qualifications; filing of state publications; deposit of designated documents; exchange of session laws. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 84, §§ 2, 3; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-107, 18-108; Laws 1953, ch. 143, §§ 3 to 5, 15; 1955, ch. 193, § 4; 1957, ch. 146, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-7, 9-8, 9-198 to 9-200, 9-202; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-1-109, 9-1-110, 9-3-901, 9-3-902, 9-3-920, 9-3-922; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

9-2-417

; Laws 1990, ch. 33, § 2; 1991, ch. 29, § 4; ch. 56, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2005, ch. 142, § 1; ch. 210, § 3; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3211

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.7.
State librarian; acquisition of books and materials; disposition of outdated and unused books; disposition of unused materials and supplies; promulgation of rules. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 143, § 8; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-199.1 to 9-199.3, 9-203; Laws 1971, ch. 170, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-903 to 9-3-905, 9-3-923; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-418; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 4; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2005, ch. 142, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3212

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.8.
Interstate Library Compact; enactment; form. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 1; ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.9; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1001; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

9-2-420

; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3213

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.9.
Compliance with local laws prerequisite to entering into library agreement. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.10; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1002; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-421; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3214

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.10.
“State library agency”. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.11; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1003; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-422; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 4; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3215

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.11.
State and federal aid to interstate library districts. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.12; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1004; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-423; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3216

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.12.
Appointment of compact administrator and deputy administrators; removal. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.13; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1005; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-424; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 5; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3217

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1026.13.
Notice of withdrawal from compact. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.14; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1006; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-425; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3218

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1027.
Short title. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 191, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-23-101

by 2020 ch. 30, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-1028.
Definitions. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 191, § 1; 1985, ch. 235, § 2; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 241, § 3; 1998, ch. 6, § 3; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2013 ch. 11, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 134, § 1, effective February 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-23-102

by 2020 ch. 30, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-1029.
Duties of department. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 191, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-23-103

by 2020 ch. 30, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-1030.
Qualification procedures. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 191, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2019 ch. 134, § 1, effective February 27, 2019; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-23-104

by 2020 ch. 30, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-1031.
Selection procedures. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 191, § 1; 2011, ch. 112, § 1; 2019 ch. 134, § 1, effective February 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-23-105

by 2020 ch. 30, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-1032.
Contract procedure. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 191, § 1; 2019 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-23-106

by 2020 ch. 30, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-1033.
Prohibited acts; civil penalty; initiation of action. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 191, § 1; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-23-107

by 2020 ch. 30, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-1034.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 70, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to community college commission, see §

21-18-201

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 179, § 1, created an employee suggestion award program for government employees and provided for its own repeal, effective July 1, 2001.

§ 9-2-1035.
Definitions. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 94, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 78, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 37, § 1, effective March 10, 2020; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3219

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1036.
Wyoming public finance and expenditure of funds website. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 94, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 37, § 1, effective March 10, 2020; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3220

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1037.
Rulemaking authority. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 190, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 37, § 1, effective March 10, 2020; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3221

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.